Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska20-416
Uniformity of application and construction.

The Rights of the Terminally Ill Act shall be applied and liberally construed so as to effectuate its general purposes.

Laws 1992, LB 671, § 16.